Washington statutes.
RCW 39.40.040

Prior bonds not affected.

This chapter shall not affect the validity or the issuance of any such bonds voted at any lawful election held prior to the taking effect of this chapter.

[ 1925 c 13 s 4; RRS s 5646-4.]